Maine, session 132, LD248.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3022, sub-§2-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. FF, §1, is
further amended to read:
2-A. Appointment of office administrator Director of Medical Examiner
Operations. The Chief Medical Examiner may appoint one office administrator a Director
of Medical Examiner Operations, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Chief Medical
Examiner. The office administrator Director of Medical Examiner Operations shall
perform such duties as may be delegated by the Chief Medical Examiner. Notwithstanding
any other provisions provision of law to the contrary, the compensation of the Chief
Medical Examiner's office administrator Director of Medical Examiner Operations must
be fixed by the Chief Medical Examiner subject to approval by the Attorney General.
Page 1 - 132LR0146(02)